Rhode Island statutes. Title 1 Aeronautics
Chapter 8 Unpiloted Aerial Vehicles

1-8-1.
Exclusive aerial regulations.

Subject to federal law, the state of Rhode Island and the Rhode Island airport corporation shall have exclusive legal authority to regulate any object capable of flying that is remotely controlled and flies autonomously through software-controlled flight plans embedded in the object’s system by a global-position system, commonly known as unpiloted aerial vehicles, remotely piloted aircraft, drones, or unmanned aircraft systems.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 261, § 1.